Utah statutes.
72-7-109.   Telecommunications Advisory Council -- Membership -- Duties.

(1)  As used in this section:

(a)  "Council" means the Telecommunications Advisory Council created in this section.

(b)  "Statewide telecommunications purposes" has the same meaning provided in Section 72-7-108.

(2) (a)  There is created within the department the Telecommunication Advisory Council consisting of six members who represent:

(i)  the governor's chief advisor on telecommunications;

(ii)  the Public Service Commission;

(iii)  the department;

(iv)  the Utah Education Network;

(v)  the Division of Purchasing and General Services within the Department of Administrative Services; and

(vi)  the Division of Public Utilities within the Department of Commerce.

(b)  The members shall be appointed by the governor with the consent of the Senate.

(3) (a)  The members shall annually elect a chair from its members.

(b)  The council shall meet as it determines necessary to accomplish its duties.

(c)  A majority of the council constitutes a quorum for the transaction of business.

(d)  Members shall receive no compensation or benefits for their services.

(4) (a)  The department shall provide staff support for the council.

(b)  The council may request assistance from other technical advisors as it determines necessary to accomplish its duties.

(5)  The council shall:

(a)  provide information, suggestions, strategic plans, priorities, and recommendations to assist the department in administering telecommunications access to interstate highway rights-of-way for statewide telecommunications purposes;

(b)  assist the department in valuing in-kind compensation in accordance with Subsection 72-7-108(3)(c);

(c)  seek input from telecommunications providers and the public;

(d)  coordinate and exchange information with other technology and telecommunications entities of the state and its political subdivisions; and

(e)  provide other assistance as requested by the department.



Amended by Chapter 176, 2002 General Session

